Wyoming, session 2025, SF0145.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-4-831(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxix) is amended to read:
9-4-831. Investment of public funds.
(a) The state treasurer, or treasurer of any
political subdivision, municipality or special district of
this state, and the various boards of trustees and boards
of directors of county hospitals, airports, fairs and other
duly constituted county boards and commissions, may invest
in:
(xxix) Equities, including stocks of
corporations. Investments made under this paragraph shall
comply with all provisions of investment policy statements
applicable to local government investing adopted by the
state loan and investment board. All risks associated with
the investment of equities under this paragraph shall be
assumed by the governmental entity making the investment. A
political subdivision shall establish an investment
advisory board to provide advice and expertise on
investments made under this paragraph. Investments made
under this paragraph shall not be subject to paragraph
(xxviii) of this subsection or W.S. 9-1-419. The state loan
and investment board shall adopt investment policy
statements for investments made by local governments and
political subdivisions under this paragraph. The board
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
shall include in the investment policy statements
requirements and conditions comparable to the requirements
and conditions specified in W.S. 9-4-715 and 9-4-716 for
the investment of public funds. Nothing in this paragraph
shall be construed to limit or alter the state treasurer's
authority to invest state funds in equities in accordance
with law.
Section 2. No political subdivision specified in W.S.
9-4-831(a)(intro) shall make investments authorized in W.S.
9-4-831(a)(xxix), as created by section 1 of this act,
before the state loan and investment board adopts
applicable investment policy statements in accordance with
this act.
Section 3. The state treasurer and the state loan and
investment board shall take all actions necessary to
implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3